Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of the State Fire  Marshal shall establish an advisory
committee to advise the department on funding for rural fire protection districts.
(2) The advisory committee shall conduct a comprehensive review of:
(a) The services provided by rural fire protection districts.
(b) Funding mechanisms available to rural fire protection districts.
(c) Funding limitations applicable to rural fire protection districts.
(3) Based on the comprehensive review described  in subsection (2) of this section, the
advisory committee:
(a) Shall develop recommendations for funding rural fire protection  districts that ensure
adequate and sustainable services.
(b) May not develop recommendations to amend ORS 478.010 (2)(c).
(4) On or  before December 31, 2026, the advisory committee shall report, in the manner
prescribed in ORS 192.245,  to a subcommittee or interim subcommittee of the Legislative
Assembly related to public safety on:
(a) The results of the comprehensive review described in subsection (2) of this  section;
and
(b) The recommendations developed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 454 (SB 454-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 454 (SB 454-A) Page 2